Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-7] Staff and funding. (a) Each
policy board shall appoint a full-time executive director of the metropolitan
planning organization who shall be independent of state and county agencies,
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary. Duties of the executive
director may be established by the policy board or in the comprehensive
agreement.

(b) A policy board may employ staff as
needed. The executive director shall be responsible for the hiring and
management of staff. The executive director and staff for a metropolitan
planning organization shall not be subject to chapter 76. All other benefits
generally applicable to the officers and employees of the State shall apply to
staff members of the metropolitan planning organization and be retroactive to
the effective date of initial hiring for existing staff.

(c) All employees of a metropolitan planning
organization shall be exempt from chapter 76 but shall be eligible to receive
the benefits of any state or federal employee benefit program generally
applicable to officers and employees of the State. [L 2015, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next